Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5638.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1. Not later than August 31, 2025, the department of technology, management, and budget shall prepare and publish a statewide strategic tariff response plan for all executive branch departments and agencies. The department of technology, management, and budget shall consult with every executive branch department and agency in developing the statewide strategic tariff response plan.